Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202664-406
Registration with Secretary of State; contents; renewal.

(1) Before performing an online notarial act, a notary public shall register with the Secretary of State in a manner prescribed by the Secretary of State.

(2) In addition to any additional information prescribed by the Secretary of State, the registration shall include:

(a) The technology the notary public intends to use to perform an online notarial act. Such technology shall be provided by an online notary solution provider approved by the Secretary of State;

(b) A certification by the notary that he or she will comply with the standards developed under section 64-407; and

(c) An email address for the notary.

(3) The term of registration as an online notary public shall coincide with the term of the commission of the notary public.

(4) An application to renew registration as an online notary public shall specify any change in the technology the online notary public intends to use to perform online notarial acts. Such technology shall be provided by an online notary solution provider approved by the Secretary of State.

(5) A person registered as an online notary public may renew his or her online notary public registration at the same time he or she renews his or her notary public commission.

Laws 2019, LB186, § 6.